utilities/dictionaries/ltg_LTG-Latgalian.aff
SFX G Y 102
SFX G t  u   [bpļr]t  is:1vtt0   # Ik Xgr.,  dzert, ceļt, maļt, kaļt;;;; stīpt, kuopt, gruobt
SFX G t  0   [bpļr]t  is:0xtt0
SFX G t  am  [bpļr]t  is:1dtt0
SFX G t  at  [bpļr]t  is:2dtt0
SFX G ļt lit     ļt  is:2dttp
SFX G aļt oltu  aļt  is:0dttv
SFX G eļt altu  eļt  is:0dttv
SFX G ert artu  ert  is:0dttv
SFX G t  ūt  [bpļr]t  is:0xtta
SFX G t  it  [bpr]t   is:2dttp
SFX G t  tu  [bp]t    is:0dttv
SFX G t  u   [^i]mt  is:1vtt0   # Ik Xgr.,        stumt
SFX G t  0   [^i]mt  is:0xtt0
SFX G t  am  [^i]mt  is:1dtt0
SFX G t  at  [^i]mt  is:2dtt0
SFX G t  ūt  [^i]mt  is:0xtta
SFX G t  it  [^i]mt  is:2dttp
SFX G t  tu  [^i]mt  is:0dttv
SFX G st  žu   [^y][^u]st  is:1vtt0   # Ik Xgr.,        zeist, svīst
SFX G st  d    [^y][^u]st  is:2vtt0
SFX G st  ž    [^y][^u]st  is:3xtt0
SFX G st  žam  [^y][^u]st  is:1dtt0
SFX G st  žat  [^y][^u]st  is:2dtt0
SFX G st  dit  [^y][^u]st  is:2dttp
SFX G st  stu  [^y][^u]st  is:0dttv
SFX G st  žūt  [^y][^u]st  is:0xtta
SFX G st  žu   [^y]ust  is:1vtt0   # Ik Xgr.,        aust
SFX G st  d    [^y]ust  is:2vtt0
SFX G st  ž    [^y]ust  is:3xtt0
SFX G st  žam  [^y]ust  is:1dtt0
SFX G st  žat  [^y]ust  is:2dtt0
SFX G st  dit  [^y]ust  is:2dttp
SFX G st  stu  [^y]ust  is:0dttv
SFX G st  žūt  [^y]ust  is:0xtta
SFX G st  šu   [y]ust  is:1vtt0   # Ik Xgr.,        pyust
SFX G st  t    [y]ust  is:2vtt0
SFX G st  š    [y]ust  is:3xtt0
SFX G st  šam  [y]ust  is:1dtt0
SFX G st  šat  [y]ust  is:2dtt0
SFX G st  tit  [y]ust  is:2dttp
SFX G st  stu  [y]ust  is:0dttv
SFX G st  šūt  [y]ust  is:0xtta
SFX G t   ju      uot  is:1vtt0   # Ik Xgr.,        juot, kruot
SFX G t   j       uot  is:0xtt0
SFX G t   jam     uot  is:1dtt0
SFX G t   jat     uot  is:2dtt0
SFX G t   jit     uot  is:2dttp
SFX G t   tu      uot  is:0dttv
SFX G t   jūt     uot  is:0xtta
SFX G it  ju   [^z]eit  is:1vtt0   # Ik Xgr.,        meit, neit
SFX G it  j    [^z]eit  is:0xtt0
SFX G it  jam  [^z]eit  is:1dtt0
SFX G it  jat  [^z]eit  is:2dtt0
SFX G it  jit  [^z]eit  is:2dttp
SFX G t   tu   [^z]eit  is:0dttv
SFX G it  jūt  [^z]eit  is:0xtta
SFX G eit  anu  [z]eit  is:1vtt0   # Ik Xgr.,        dzeit
SFX G eit  en   [z]eit  is:2vtt0
SFX G eit  an   [z]eit  is:3xtt0
SFX G eit  anam [z]eit  is:1dtt0
SFX G eit  anat [z]eit  is:2dtt0
SFX G it   nit  [z]eit  is:2dttp
SFX G t    tu   [z]eit  is:0dttv
SFX G eit  anūt [z]eit  is:0xtta
SFX G t  du   ūt  is:1vtt0   # Ik Xgr.,        dūt
SFX G t  d    ūt  is:0xtt0
SFX G t  dam  ūt  is:1dtt0
SFX G t  dat  ūt  is:2dtt0
SFX G t  dit  ūt  is:2dttp
SFX G t  tu   ūt  is:0dttv
SFX G t  dūt  ūt  is:0xtta
SFX G ēt  ieju   ēt  is:1vtt0   # Ik Xgr.,        dēt
SFX G t   j      ēt  is:2vtt0
SFX G ēt  iej    ēt  is:3xtt0
SFX G ēt  iejam  ēt  is:1dtt0
SFX G ēt  iejat  ēt  is:2dtt0
SFX G ēt  iejit  ēt  is:2dttp
SFX G ēt  ātu    ēt  is:0dttv
SFX G ēt  iejūt  ēt  is:0xtta
SFX G imt amu   imt  is:1vtt0   # Ik Xgr.,        jimt
SFX G imt am    imt  is:2vtt0
SFX G imt em    imt  is:3xtt0
SFX G imt emam  imt  is:1dtt0
SFX G imt emat  imt  is:2dtt0
SFX G imt emit  imt  is:2dttp
SFX G t   tu    imt  is:0dttv
SFX G imt emūt  imt  is:0xtta
SFX G t   u    gt  is:1vtt0   # Ik Xgr.,  augt
SFX G gt  dz   gt  is:2vtt0
SFX G t   0    gt  is:3xtt0
SFX G t   am   gt  is:1dtt0
SFX G t   at   gt  is:2dtt0
SFX G gt dzit  gt  is:2dttp
SFX G t   tu   gt  is:0dttv
SFX G t   ūt   gt  is:0xtta
SFX G t   nu   īt  is:1vtt0   # Ik Xgr.,      skrīt, sīt, slīt
SFX G t   n    īt  is:0xtt0
SFX G t   nam  īt  is:1dtt0
SFX G t   not  īt  is:2dtt0
SFX G t   nit  īt  is:2dttp
SFX G 0   u    īt  is:0dttv
SFX G t   nūt  īt  is:0xtta
