utilities/dictionaries/ltg_LTG-Latgalian.dic
aizaugt/0GMN27-
aizrīzt/0GMN38-
atīzt/0GMN38-
atrīzt/0GMN38-
izrīzt/0GMN38-
īzt/GMN38-
puorstumt/0GLN27-
puorsvīst/0GLN27-
puorūrbt/0GMN28-
rībt/GMN28-
rīzt/GMN38-
saaugt/0GMN27-
sadēt/0GMN27-
sadzeļt/0GLN27-
sagluobt/0GMN28-
sajimt/0GMN28-
sakaļt/0GLN27-
saknībt/0GMN28-
sakruot/0GLN27-
sakuopt/0GMN28-
sameit/0GLN27-
sapyust/0GMN27-
sarīzt/0GMN38-
saskrīt/0GLN27-
sasmeļt/0GLN27-
saspīst/0GLN27-
sastumt/0GLN27-
sasvīst/0GLN27-
saškeļt/0GLN27-
sašuopt/0GMN28-
savībt/0GMN28-
sazīst/0GLN27-
spert/GLN27-
sprīst/GLN27-
stuot/GLN27-
šīpt/GMN28-
škībt/GMN28-
ūrbt/GMN28-
vībt/GMN28-
zīst/GLN27-
